North Carolina, session 2025, HB600.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Chapter 71A of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
section to read:
*H600-v-2*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
"§ 71A-7.3. The Tuscarora Indians of Kahtenuaka Territories; rights, privileges,
immunities, obligations, and duties.
The Indians who comprise The Tuscarora Indians of Kahtenuaka Territories, whose ancestors
signed treaties with the government of North Carolina and were granted the Indian Woods
Reservation on the Roanoke River in Bertie County, shall, from and after July 1, 2026, be
designated and officially recognized as The Tuscarora Indians of Kahtenuaka Territories, and
they shall continue to enjoy all their rights, privileges, and immunities as an American Indian
Tribe with a recognized tribal governing body carrying out and exercising substantial
governmental duties and powers similar to the State. The Tuscarora Indians of Kahtenuaka
Territories shall be recognized as eligible for the special programs and services provided by the
United States to Indians because of their status as Indians. The Tuscarora shall maintain
individual enrollment criteria, providing an opportunity for all North Carolina Tuscarora
descendants to enroll and shall govern themselves in a manner that will benefit and unify all
Tuscarora that come under their governance."
SECTION 2. G.S. 143B-407 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143B-407. North Carolina State Commission of Indian Affairs – membership; term of
office; chairman; compensation.
(a) The State Commission of Indian Affairs shall consist of two persons appointed by the
General Assembly, the Secretary of Health and Human Services, the Assistant Secretary of
Commerce in charge of the Division of Employment Security, the Secretary of Administration,
the Secretary of Environmental Quality, the Commissioner of Labor or their designees and 21 23
representatives of the Indian community. These Indian members shall be selected by tribal or
community consent from the Indian groups that are recognized by the State of North Carolina
and are principally geographically located as follows: the Coharie of Sampson and Harnett
Counties; the Eastern Band of Cherokees; the Haliwa Saponi of Halifax, Warren, and adjoining
counties; the Lumbees of Robeson, Hoke and Scotland Counties; the Meherrin of Hertford
County; the Waccamaw-Siouan from Columbus and Bladen Counties; the Sappony; the
Occaneechi Band of the Saponi Nation of Alamance and Orange Counties, The Tuscarora Indians
of Kahtenuaka Territories, and the Native Americans located in Cumberland, Guilford, Johnston,
Mecklenburg, Orange, and Wake Counties. The Coharie shall have two members; the Eastern
Band of Cherokees, two; the Haliwa Saponi, two; the Lumbees, three; the Meherrin, one; the
Waccamaw-Siouan, two; the Sappony, one; the Cumberland County Association for Indian
People, two; the Guilford Native Americans, two; the Metrolina Native Americans, two; the
Occaneechi Band of the Saponi Nation, one, one; the Triangle Native American Society, one.
one; The Tuscarora Indians of Kahtenuaka Territories, two. Of the two appointments made by
the General Assembly, one shall be made upon the recommendation of the Speaker, and one shall
be made upon recommendation of the President Pro Tempore of the Senate. Appointments by
the General Assembly shall be made in accordance with G.S. 120-121 and vacancies shall be
filled in accordance with G.S. 120-122.
…."
SECTION 3. G.S. 143B-135.5 reads as rewritten:
"Part 30A. American Indian Heritage Commission.
"§ 143B-135.5. American Indian Heritage Commission established.
…
(b) Members. – The Commission shall consist of 12 members. The initial board shall be
selected on or before February 1, 2022, as follows:13 members, as follows:
(1) One representative recommended by each of the following tribes: Coharie,
Eastern Band of Cherokee Indians, Haliwa-Saponi, Lumbee, Meherrin,
Occaneechi Band of the Saponi Nation, Sappony, The Tuscarora Indians of
Kahtenuaka Territories, and Waccamaw-Siouan.
Page 2 House Bill 600-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) One representative recommended by each of the following organizations:
Cumberland County Association for Indian People, Guilford Native American
Association, Metrolina Native American Association, and the Triangle Native
American Society.
(c) Terms. – The members recommended by the Coharie, Eastern Band of Cherokee
Indians, Haliwa-Saponi, and Lumbee Tribes and the members recommended by the Cumberland
County Association for Indian People and the Guilford Native American Association shall serve
initial terms of two years expiring on June 30, 2023. The members recommended by the
Meherrin, Occaneechi Band of the Saponi Nation, Sappony, and Waccamaw-Siouan Tribes and
the members recommended by the Metrolina Native American Association and the Triangle
Native American Society shall serve initial terms of three years expiring on June 30, 2024. The
member recommended by The Tuscarora Indians of Kahtenuaka Territories shall serve an initial
term of three years expiring on June 30, 2029. Upon the expiration of the terms of the initial
members of the Commission, each member shall be appointed to terms for three years and shall
serve until a successor is appointed.
…."
SECTION 4. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Administration the sum of five thousand dollars ($5,000) in nonrecurring funds to assist the North
Carolina Commission of Indian Affairs with updating its website, materials, and other
documentation to reflect the new membership of the Commission.
SECTION 5. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Natural and Cultural Resources the sum of five thousand dollars ($5,000) in nonrecurring funds
to assist the American Indian Heritage Commission with updating its website, materials, and
other documentation to reflect the new membership of the Commission.
SECTION 6. Sections 4 and 5 of this act become effective July 1, 2026. The
remainder of this act is effective when it becomes law.
House Bill 600-Second Edition Page 3